District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

47-2411.01

Penalty; interest.

Repealed.

May 27, 1949, 63 Stat. 139, ch. 146, title VI, § 612
Mar. 10, 1982, D.C. Law 4-71, § 2, 28 DCR 5243
Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-209, § 406, 34 DCR 689
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 406(ss)(2), 48 DCR 334
1981 Ed., § 47-2411.1.
Section 601(b) of D.C. Law 6-209 provided that title III and sections 401, 402, 404, 405 and 406 of the act shall take effect on October 1, 1987.
Section 410(d) of D.C. Law 13-305 provided: “Section 406(a), (c), (j), (m), (p), (q), (s), (w), (bb), (dd), (ee), (hh) through (kk), (mm) through (oo), (qq) through (uu), (yy), (zz), (bbb), (ddd), and (fff) shall apply for all tax years or taxable periods beginning after December 31, 2000.”